Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202048-3502
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Workplace Privacy Act:

(1) Adverse action means the discharge of an employee, a threat against an employee, or any other act against an employee that negatively affects the employee’s employment;

(2) Applicant means a prospective employee applying for employment;

(3) Electronic communication device means a cellular telephone, personal digital assistant, electronic device with mobile data access, laptop computer, pager, broadband personal communication device, two-way messaging device, electronic game, or portable computing device;

(4) Employee means an individual employed by an employer;

(5) Employer means a public or nonpublic entity or an individual engaged in a business, an industry, a profession, a trade, or other enterprise in the state, including any agent, representative, or designee acting directly or indirectly in the interest of such an employer; and

(6)(a) Personal Internet account means an individual’s online account that requires login information in order to access or control the account.

(b) Personal Internet account does not include:

(i) An online account that an employer or educational institution supplies or pays for, except when the employer or educational institution pays only for additional features or enhancements to the online account; or

(ii) An online account that is used exclusively for a business purpose of the employer.

Laws 2016, LB821, § 2.